District of Columbia statutes.
38-1207.05

Limitation on grants.

No tuition grant pursuant to this subchapter shall be offered or approved for any student who has previously been the recipient of a tuition grant but has failed to remain in good academic standing by reason of neglect of the student’s academic work.

History

Oct. 26, 1974, Pub. L. 93-471, title VII, § 705
as added Feb. 18, 1988, D.C. Law 7-74, § 2, 34 DCR 7946

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-1207.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1575.